New York, session 2025-2026, S944.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 189 of the state finance law is amended by adding a 2 new subdivision 1-a to read as follows: 3 1-a. Any person who, in accordance with the criteria set forth in 4 subdivision four of this section: 5 (a) makes, uses, or causes to be made or used, a false record or 6 statement material to their own obligation to pay money to the state or 7 a local government under the tax law, or an obligation of a subsidiary, 8 partnership, corporation or entity that they control; or 9 (b) conceals or improperly avoids or decreases their own obligation to 10 pay money to the state or a local government under the tax law, or an 11 obligation of a subsidiary, partnership, corporation or entity that they 12 control; shall be liable for damages, including consequential damages, 13 which the state or local government sustains because of the act of that 14 person. For purposes of this section, consequential damages includes 15 interest owed pursuant to the tax law. 16 § 2. Paragraph (b) of subdivision 3 of section 188 of the state 17 finance law, as amended by chapter 379 of the laws of 2010, is amended 18 to read as follows: EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03215-01-5 S. 944 2 1 (b) require no proof of specific intent to defraud, provided, however 2 that acts occurring by mistake or as a result of mere negligence are not 3 covered by this [article] definition. 4 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to all 5 false claims, records, statements and obligations concealed, avoided or 6 decreased on, prior to, or after such effective date.